Connecticut, session 2026, HB05227.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) As used in this section and
sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act:
(1) "Commercial mold remediation" (A) means mold remediation
performed in any building, or any portion thereof, that is not used or
designed to be used as (i) a dwelling place, or (ii) a private residence or
residential rental property, as such terms are defined in section 20-419
of the general statutes, and (B) does not include any home improvement
performed by a contractor, as such terms are defined in section 20-419
of the general statutes;
(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection;
(3) "Department" means the Department of Consumer Protection;
(4) "Mold" (A) means any form of multicellular fungi found in water-
damaged indoor environments or water-damaged building materials,
and (B) includes, but is not limited to, Cladosporium, Penicillium,
Alternaria, Aspergillus, Fusarium, Trichoderma, Memnoniella, Mucor
and Stachybotrys chartarum;
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5227
(5) "Mold remediation" (A) means the removal, cleaning, sanitizing,
demolition or other treatment of mold or mold-contaminated matter in
buildings, and (B) includes, but is not limited to, activities intended to
prevent mold or mold contamination in buildings; and
(6) "Person" means any individual, association, corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, trust or other legal entity.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) On and after January 1, 2027,
no person shall perform commercial mold remediation in this state for
compensation, or use the title "mold remediator" or display or use any
words, letters, figures, title, sign, advertisement or other device to
indicate that such person performs or offers to perform commercial
mold remediation in this state for compensation, unless such person
holds a valid certificate of registration issued by the Department of
Consumer Protection pursuant to section 3 of this act.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) A person seeking to perform
commercial mold remediation in this state for compensation shall
register with the Department of Consumer Protection in a form and
manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection. The
department shall not issue a certificate of registration to any person
under this section unless the person seeking such certificate of
registration submits proof to the department, satisfactory to the
commissioner, that such person (1) is certified as a mold remediation
specialist by the Institute of Inspection Cleaning and Restoration
Certification, (2) is certified as a mold remediator by the National
Organization of Remediators and Microbial Inspectors, or (3) is certified
to perform mold remediation by any organization approved by the
commissioner, provided the commissioner posts notice of such
approval and the name of such approved organization on the
department's Internet web site.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) A person who holds a valid
certificate of registration issued by the Department of Consumer
Protection pursuant to section 3 of this act shall perform all commercial
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5227
mold remediation in this state in accordance with the ANSI/IICRC S520
"Standard for Professional Mold Remediation", or any successor or
revision to said standard approved by the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection, provided the commissioner posts notice of such approval
and the name of such approved successor or revision on the
department's Internet web site.
Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Consumer Protection shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
provisions of sections 2 to 4, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Any violation of any of the
provisions of sections 2 to 4, inclusive, of this act shall constitute an
unfair or deceptive trade practice for the purposes of subsection (a) of
section 42-110b of the general statutes.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Consumer Protection;
(3) "Engage in fire and catastrophic restoration work" means to
assess, mitigate, repair, restore or reconstruct, for compensation, real or
personal property in this state that has been damaged or destroyed by
fire, smoke, water, a natural disaster or any other catastrophic event;
(4) "Fire and catastrophic restoration business" means a person who
holds an active license issued by the Department of Consumer
Protection under this section; and
(5) "Person" means an individual, association, company, limited
liability company, corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, trust or
other legal entity.
(b) No person shall engage in fire and catastrophic restoration work
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5227
unless such person holds an active fire and catastrophic restoration
license issued by the Department of Consumer Protection under this
section.
(c) Each applicant for a fire and catastrophic restoration license shall
submit to the Department of Consumer Protection, in a form and
manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection, an
application for a fire and catastrophic restoration license. Such
application shall include such information as the commissioner may
require to determine that the applicant is fit to hold a fire and
catastrophic restoration license. The initial fee for a fire and catastrophic
restoration license shall be one hundred fifty dollars and the license
renewal fee shall be one hundred dollars. A fire and catastrophic
restoration license shall be valid for a period of one year from the date
of issuance. Not later than forty-five days prior to the expiration date of
a fire and catastrophic restoration license, the department shall send or
transmit to the licensee, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, a fire and catastrophic restoration license renewal
application. Any applicant aggrieved by any decision of the
commissioner made pursuant to this subsection shall be afforded an
opportunity for hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54
of the general statutes.
100 (d) The Department of Consumer Protection shall establish and
101 maintain a publicly accessible registry of fire and catastrophic
102 restoration businesses. Such registry shall, at a minimum, (1) include the
103 name and address of each fire and catastrophic restoration business, and
104 (2) for each fire and catastrophic restoration business, disclose (A)
105 whether such fire and catastrophic restoration business (i) is in good
106 standing with the department, or (ii) has violated any provision of this
107 section or any other law or regulation applicable to fire and catastrophic
108 restoration businesses, and (B) whether any complaint has been filed
109 against such fire and catastrophic restoration business, and, if so, the
110 nature of such complaint.
111 (e) Each fire and catastrophic restoration business shall:
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5227
112 (1) Engage in fire and catastrophic restoration work, and ensure that
113 each of its employees engages in fire and catastrophic restoration work,
114 in a manner that is consistent with all relevant standards established by
115 the American National Standards Institute or a similar organization
116 recognized by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection, provided the
117 commissioner has posted the name of such similar organization on the
118 Department of Consumer Protection's Internet web site;
119 (2) Enroll in the Corporate Emergency Access System or a similar
120 system approved by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection,
121 provided the commissioner has posted the name of such similar system
122 on the Department of Consumer Protection's Internet web site, and issue
123 standardized credentials to its essential employees in accordance with
124 the requirements established by such system;
125 (3) Ensure that each of its employees wears, at all times while such
126 employee is engaged in fire and catastrophic restoration work on behalf
127 of such fire and catastrophic restoration business, an identification
128 badge that displays the following in a manner that is clearly visible to
129 members of the public: (A) Such employee's name; (B) the name of such
130 fire and catastrophic restoration business; and (C) a photograph of such
131 employee; and
132 (4) Ensure that each of its employees wears, at all times while such
133 employee is engaged in fire and catastrophic restoration work on behalf
134 of such fire and catastrophic restoration business in an area which is the
135 subject of any disaster emergency declaration issued by the Governor
136 pursuant to chapter 517 of the general statutes, any transportation
137 emergency declaration issued by the Governor pursuant to section 3-6b
138 of the general statutes or any major disaster or emergency declaration
139 issued by the President of the United States, (A) the identification badge
140 required under subdivision (3) of this subsection, and (B) the
141 standardized credentials issued to such employee pursuant to
142 subdivision (2) of this subsection.
143 (f) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall adopt
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5227
144 regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the
145 general statutes, to implement the provisions of this section.
146 (g) Any person who engages in fire and catastrophic restoration work
147 without an active fire and catastrophic restoration license issued by the
148 Department of Consumer Protection under this section shall be fined
149 not more than one thousand dollars per violation.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2, "Beginning on" was changed to "On and after" for
consistency with standard drafting conventions; in Section 4, "to said
standard" was added for clarity; in Section 6 "any of the provisions of"
was added for consistency with standard drafting conventions; and in
Section 7(a)(3), (b), (e)(1), (e)(3), (e)(4) and (g), references to
engagement "in the fire and catastrophic restoration business" were
changed to references to engagement "in fire and catastrophic
restoration work" for clarity.
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6